California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 148.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

19777.5.

(a) There shall be added to the tax for each taxable year for which amnesty could have been requested:

(1) For amounts that are due and payable on the last day of the amnesty period, an amount equal to 50 percent of the accrued interest payable under Section 19101 for the period beginning on the last date prescribed by law for the payment of that tax (determined without regard to extensions) and ending on the last day of the amnesty period specified in Section 19731.

(2) For amounts that become due and payable after the last date of the amnesty period, an amount equal to 50 percent of the interest computed under Section 19101 on any final amount, including final deficiencies and self-assessed amounts, for the period beginning on the last date prescribed by law for the payment of the tax for the year of the deficiency (determined without regard to extensions) and ending on the last day of the amnesty period specified in Section 19731.

(3) For purposes of paragraph (2), Sections 19107, 19108, 19110, and 19113 shall apply in determining the amount computed under Section 19101.

(b) The penalty imposed by this section is in addition to any other penalty imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part.

(c) This section does not apply to any amounts that are treated as paid during the amnesty program period under paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 19733 or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 19733.

(d) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031), (relating to deficiency assessments) shall not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed by subdivision (a).

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 19301), a taxpayer may not file a claim for refund or credit for any amounts paid in connection with the penalty imposed in subdivision (a), except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) A taxpayer may file a claim for refund for any amounts paid to satisfy a penalty imposed under
 subdivision (a) on the grounds that the amount of the penalty was not properly computed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 18415, the amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to penalties imposed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) after March 31, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 398, Sec. 8.   Effective September 29, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19778.

For any amended return filed after April 15, 2004, and before the taxpayer is contacted by the Internal Revenue Service or the Franchise Tax Board regarding a potentially abusive tax shelter, then, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1998, with respect to any understatement of tax related to using reportable transactions as defined in Section 18407, as added by the act adding this section, the taxpayer is subject to interest as provided under Section 19101 but at a rate of 150 percent of the adjusted annual rate established under Section
 19521.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 656, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Res Judicata [19801. - 19802.]

19801.

In the determination of any issue of law or fact under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part, neither the Franchise Tax Board nor any officer or agency having any administrative duties under this part nor any court is bound by the determination of any other officer or administrative agency of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19802.

(a) In the determination of any case arising under this part, the rule of res judicata is applicable only if the liability involved is for the same year as was involved in another case previously determined.

(b) Notwithstanding the holding in Pope Estate Company v. Johnson, 43 Cal. App. 2d 170, in any action filed pursuant to Section 19382 (relating to taxpayer suits for refund), in addition to the defenses or relief sought in the action, the
 Franchise Tax Board shall assert in defense only those unpaid liabilities of the taxpayer for the same year which are evidenced by any of the following:

(1) A final proposed assessment.

(2) A notice of tax due.

(3) A final notice of action.

In addition, any refund claim of a taxpayer for the same year resulting from a federal audit adjustment made subsequent to the filing of the action need not be asserted by the taxpayer in that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10.3. EARNED INCOME TAX CREDIT INFORMATION ACT [19850. - 19854.]

19850.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the Earned Income Tax Credit Information Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19851.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Congress created the federal earned income tax credit (EITC) in 1975 to offset the adverse effects of the Medicare and social security payroll taxes on working poor families and to encourage low-income workers to seek employment rather than welfare.

(b) Due to a relatively low percentage of federal earned income tax credit eligible persons who participate in the federal Earned Income Tax Credit program, hundreds of millions of federal dollars go unclaimed by the working poor in California.

(c) In 2015, the State of California authorized a California EITC to amplify the poverty-reducing effects of the federal
 EITC for the poorest working Californians.

(d) In order to alleviate the tax burden on working poor persons and families, to enhance the wages and income of working poor persons and families, to ensure that California taxpayers receive their share of the federal money available in the federal EITC program and other state and federal antipoverty tax credits, to ensure that the poorest working Californians access the additional California EITC, and to inject additional federal money into the California economy, the state shall facilitate the furnishing of information, as permitted by Section 19551.3, to working poor persons and families regarding the availability of the federal and California EITC so that they may claim those credits on their federal and state income tax returns.

(e) It is the intent of this act to offer the most cost-effective assistance to eligible taxpayers by
 taking steps to ensure that eligible Californians claim both the federal and California EITC and other state and federal antipoverty tax credits and are aware of free tax preparation services through the following:

(1) Notices provided by their employers.

(2) Notices provided by state departments and agencies that serve those who may qualify for the EITC.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 55, Sec. 8.   (SB 131)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

19852.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Employer” means any California employer who is subject to, and is required to provide, unemployment insurance to their employees, under the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(b) “Employee” means any person who is covered by unemployment insurance by their employer, pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(c) “Federal EITC” means the federal earned income tax credit, as defined in Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) “California
 EITC” means the California earned income tax credit, as defined in Section 17052.

(e) “State departments and agencies that serve those who may qualify for Voluntary Income Tax Assistance or state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC” means the following departments and agencies:

(1) The State Department of Education with respect to information from the free or reduced-price meal program and National School Lunch Program.

(2) The Employment Development Department with respect to information from the California Unemployment Insurance program.

(3) The State Department of Health Care Services with respect to
 information from the Medi-Cal program.

(4) The State Department of Social Services with respect to information from the CalFresh and CalWORKs programs.

(f) “State and federal antipoverty tax credits” means state and federal tax credits that are designed to alleviate poverty and tax burdens for low-income households.

(g) “Voluntary Income Tax Assistance” or “(VITA)” means the free basic income tax return preparation program, for federal and state personal income tax returns, managed by the Internal Revenue Service and operated by Internal Revenue Service partners and trained volunteers.

(h) “CalFile” means the Franchise Tax Board’s free, direct, online
 program for taxpayers to complete and e-file their state personal income tax returns.

(i) Unless otherwise specifically provided, the terms “Internal Revenue Code,” “Internal Revenue Code of 1954,” or “Internal Revenue Code of 1986,” for purposes of this part, mean Title 26 of the United States Code, including all amendments thereto, as enacted on the specified date for the applicable taxable year as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17024.5. 

(j) The amendments made to this section by Section 2 of Chapter 294 of the Statutes of 2016 shall apply to notices required pursuant to Section 19853 furnished on or after January 1, 2017.

(k) The amendments made to this section by Section 9 of Chapter 55 of
 the Statutes of 2023 shall apply to notices required pursuant to Section 19853 furnished on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 72.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19853.

(a) (1) An employer shall notify all employees that they may be eligible for VITA, CalFile, and state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC, within one week before or after, or at the same time, that the employer provides an annual wage summary, including, but not limited to, a Form W-2 or a Form 1099, to any employee.

(2) An employer shall send a second notification to all employees during the month of March of the same year in which the employer notified employees pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) (1) The state departments and agencies that serve those who may qualify for VITA or state and federal antipoverty
 tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 19852, shall notify their program recipients that they may be eligible for VITA, CalFile, and state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC, at least once per year during the months of January through March, or, alternatively, shall provide both notifications during a regularly scheduled contact with a recipient by telephone, mail, or electronic communication, or by an in-person communication.

(2) State departments or
 agencies that serve those who may qualify for VITA or state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 19852, and that do not directly communicate with persons or households with persons who may qualify for VITA, CalFile, and state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC, may communicate indirectly through agencies, districts, or regulated entities that serve eligible persons or households with eligible persons.

(3) State departments or agencies that serve those who may qualify for VITA or state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal EITC and the California EITC, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 19852, are encouraged to develop the most effective method to provide notice to recipients of eligibility for VITA, CalFile, and state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the
 California EITC, as long as the notice contains substantially the same language as the notice described in Section 19854.

(c) (1) The employer shall provide the notifications required by subdivision (a) by handing them directly to the employee or mailing them to the employee’s last known address.

(2) Any notice created by the employer shall include substantially the same language as the notice described in Section 19854.

(3) The notification required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be sent electronically.

(d) The employer shall not satisfy the notification required by subdivision (a) by posting a notice on an employee bulletin board or sending it through office mail. However, these methods of notification are encouraged to
 help inform all employees of VITA, CalFile, and state and federal antipoverty tax credit eligibility, including the federal and the California EITC.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (c) and (d), the employer may provide the notification required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) via email to an email account of the employee’s choosing in PDF, JPEG, or other digital image file type format, if an employee affirmatively, and in writing or by electronic acknowledgment, opts into receipt of electronic statements or materials.

(2) An employer may not discharge an employee or in any manner discriminate, retaliate, or take any adverse action against an employee who does not affirmatively, in writing or by electronic acknowledgment, opt into receipt of electronic statements or
 materials.

(f) The amendments made to this section by Section 3 of Chapter 294 of the Statutes of 2016 shall apply to notices furnished on or after January 1, 2017.

(g) The amendments made to this section by
 Section 10 of Chapter 55 of the Statutes of 2023 shall apply to notices furnished on or after January 1, 2024.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to notices furnished on or after January 1, 2024.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 277, Sec. 1.   (AB 1355)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 277.)
-------------------------------------------

19853.

(a) (1) An employer shall notify all employees that they may be eligible for VITA, CalFile, and state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC, within one week before or after, or at the same time, that the employer provides an annual wage summary, including, but not limited to, a Form W-2 or a Form 1099, to any employee.

(2) An employer shall send a second notification to all employees during the month of March of the same year in which the employer notified employees pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) (1) The state departments and agencies that serve those who may qualify for VITA or state and federal antipoverty
 tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 19852, shall notify their program recipients that they may be eligible for VITA, CalFile, and state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC, at least once per year during the months of January through March, or, alternatively, shall provide both notifications during a regularly scheduled contact with a recipient by telephone, mail, or electronic communication, or by an in-person communication.

(2) State departments or agencies that serve those who may qualify for VITA or state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 19852, and that do not directly communicate with persons or households with persons who may qualify for VITA, CalFile, and state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the California
 EITC, may communicate indirectly through agencies, districts, or regulated entities that serve eligible persons or households with eligible persons.

(3) State departments or agencies that serve those who may qualify for VITA or state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal EITC and the California EITC, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 19852, are encouraged to develop the most effective method to provide notice to recipients of eligibility for VITA, CalFile, and state and federal antipoverty tax credits, including the federal and the California EITC, as long as the notice contains substantially the same language as the notice described in Section 19854.

(c) (1) The employer shall provide the notifications required by subdivision (a) by handing them directly to the employee or mailing them to the employee’s last known address.

(2) Any notice created by the employer shall include substantially the same language as the notice described in Section 19854.

(3) The notification required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be sent electronically.

(d) The employer shall not satisfy the notification required by subdivision (a) by posting a notice on an employee bulletin board or sending it through office mail. However, these methods of notification are encouraged to help inform all employees of VITA, CalFile, and state and federal antipoverty tax credit eligibility, including the federal and the California EITC.

(e) The amendments made to this section by Section 3 of Chapter 294 of the Statutes of 2016 shall apply to notices furnished on or after January 1, 2017.

(f) The amendments made to this section by Section 10 of Chapter 55 of the Statutes of 2023 shall apply to notices furnished on or after January 1, 2024.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   (AB 1355)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19854.

(a) The notice required under Section 19853 to be furnished to employees and public assistance program recipients regarding the availability of the federal and the California EITC shall state substantially as follows:
Based on your annual earning, you may be eligible for the following assistance:

Voluntary Income Tax Assistance (VITA) Program – VITA is a free basic income tax return preparation program, for federal and state personal income tax returns, managed by the Internal Revenue Service and operated by Internal Revenue Service partners and trained volunteers.

Federal Earned Income Tax Credit (federal EITC) – The federal EITC is a refundable credit for
 low-income working individuals and families. The federal EITC will not impact certain public assistance benefits. In addition, federal EITC payments are typically NOT used to determine eligibility for the following:

(A) Medicaid.

(B) Supplemental Security Income.

(C) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.

(D) Low-income housing.

(E) Temporary Assistance for Needy Families payments.

To receive the federal EITC, you must file a federal tax return and fill out the EITC form, which can be found in the Federal Income Tax Return Booklet. For additional information on your eligibility to receive the federal EITC and other federal antipoverty tax
 credits, visit www.irs.gov.

California Earned Income Tax Credit (California EITC) and Young Child Tax Credit (YCTC) – The California EITC and YCTC are refundable credits for low-income working individuals and families. The California EITC and YCTC are similar to the federal EITC and will not impact certain public assistance benefits.

Foster Youth Tax Credit (FYTC) – The FYTC is a refundable credit for former and current foster youth between 18 and 25 years of age who were in foster care while 13 years of age or older. The FYTC will not impact certain public assistance benefits.

To claim the California EITC, you must file a California Income Tax Return and fill out the California EITC form (Form FTB 3514) and attach it to your tax return. For additional information on the availability of the credit, including eligibility requirements, or form questions, visit www.ftb.ca.gov and
 enter “CalEITC” in the search box.

You may also be eligible to have both your federal and state tax returns prepared and filed for free using VITA services. For additional information on the free tax filing service, and location and hours of operation, visit www.ftb.ca.gov and enter “VITA” in the search box.

Additionally, you may be eligible to e-file your California return directly with the Franchise Tax Board for free using CalFile. For additional information on CalFile, visit www.ftb.ca.gov and enter “CalFile” in the search box.
(b) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 294 of the Statutes of 2016 apply to notices furnished on or after January 1, 2017.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to
 notices furnished on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 55, Sec. 11.   (SB 131)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10.4. Small Business Relief Act [19900. - 19907.]

19900.

(a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2026, a qualified entity doing business in this state, as defined in Section 23101, and that is required to file a return under Section 18633, 18633.5, or subdivision (a) of Section 18601, may elect to annually pay an elective tax according to or measured by its qualified net income, defined in paragraph (2), computed at the rate of 9.3 percent for the taxable year for which the election is made.

(2) For purposes of this section, the “qualified net income” of a qualified entity means the sum of the pro rata share or distributive share of income, and any guaranteed payments, as
 described by Section 707(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to guaranteed payments, subject to tax under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) for the taxable year of each qualified taxpayer, as defined in Section 17052.10.

(b) (1) The elective tax authorized by this part shall be in addition to, and not in place of, any other tax or fee required to be paid under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(2) The elective tax described in this part shall be assessed and collected under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401).

(3) Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this part and those in Part 10 (commencing with
 Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall apply.

(c) (1) The qualified entity may include in its qualified net income the pro rata share or distributive share of the income of any of its partners, shareholders, or members upon their consent. A partner, shareholder, or member that does not consent does not prevent the qualified entity from making an election to pay the elective tax.

(2) All partners, shareholders, and members of the qualified entity shall be bound by the election made under this part for the taxable year.

(d) The election shall be irrevocable and shall be made on an original, timely filed return required under
 Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) for the taxable year of the election in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) The amendments made to this section by Section 14 of Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2022 shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 73.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 19906.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 19906.)
-------------------------------------------

19902.

(a) For purposes of this part, “qualified entity” means an entity that meets both of the following requirements for the taxable year:

(1) The entity is taxed as a partnership or “S” corporation.

(2) The entity’s partners, shareholders, or members in that taxable year are exclusively corporations, as defined in Section 23038, or taxpayers as defined in Section 17004.

(b) “Qualified entity” shall not include any of the following:

(1) Publicly traded partnerships, as defined in Section 7704 of the Internal Revenue Code, as it read on January 1, 2021, as modified by Section
 17008.5.

(2) An entity that is permitted or required to be in a combined reporting group, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 25106.5 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 15.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 19906.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 19906.)
-------------------------------------------

19904.

(a) The elective tax authorized by this part shall be due and payable as follows:

(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022, on or before the due date of the original return that the qualified entity is required to file pursuant to Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) without regard to any extension of time for filing the return, for the taxable year of the election made pursuant to Section 19900.

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2026, as follows:

(A) On or before June 15th during the taxable year of the election, an amount equal to, or greater than, either 50 percent of the elective tax paid the prior taxable year or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater.

(B) On or before the due date of the original return that the qualified entity is required to file pursuant to Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) without regard to any extension of time for filing the return for the taxable year of the election made pursuant to Section 19900, an amount equal to the amount of the elective tax under subdivision (a) of Section 19900, less the payment made on or before June 15th of the taxable year pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1,
 2022, and before January 1, 2026, if no payment is made as required in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, the qualified entity may not make the election under Section 19900 for that taxable year.

(c) This part shall not change any filing requirements under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(d) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations that are necessary or appropriate to implement this part.

(2) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any regulation, rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the
 Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 705, Sec. 2.   (SB 851)   Effective September 28, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 19906.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 19906.)
-------------------------------------------

19906.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this part shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(b) If before December 1, 2026, Section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the limitation on individual deductions for taxable years 2018 through 2025, as it read on January 1, 2021, is repealed, this part would become inoperative for taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 after Section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, as it read on January 1, 2021, is repealed, and shall be repealed December 1 of that taxable year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 82, Sec. 15.   (AB 150)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Part 10.4, comprising sections 19900 to 19907.)
-------------------------------------------

19907.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the terms “Internal Revenue Code,” “Internal Revenue Code of 1954,” or “Internal Revenue Code of 1986,” for purposes of this part, mean Title 26 of the United States Code, including all amendments thereto, as enacted on the specified date for the applicable taxable year as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17024.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 74.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 19906.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 19906.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10.4.1. Small Business Relief Act [19910. - 19916.]

19910.

(a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, a qualified entity doing business in this state, as defined in Section 23101, and that is required to file a return under Section 18633, 18633.5, or subdivision (a) of Section 18601, may elect to annually pay an elective tax according to or measured by its qualified net income, defined in paragraph (2), computed at the rate of 9.3 percent for the taxable year for which the election is made.

(2) For purposes of this section, the “qualified net income” of a qualified entity means the sum of the pro rata share or distributive share of income, and any guaranteed
 payments, as described by Section 707(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to guaranteed payments, subject to tax under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) for the taxable year of each qualified taxpayer, as defined in Section 17052.11.

(b) (1) The elective tax authorized by this part shall be in addition to, and not in place of, any other tax or fee required to be paid under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(2) The elective tax described in this part shall be assessed and collected under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401).

(3) Unless the
 context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this part and those in Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall apply.

(c) (1) The qualified entity may include in its qualified net income the pro rata share or distributive share of the income of any of its partners, shareholders, or members upon their consent. A partner, shareholder, or member that does not consent does not prevent the qualified entity from making an election to pay the elective tax.

(2) All partners, shareholders, and members of the qualified entity shall be bound by the election made under this part for the taxable year.

(d) The election shall be irrevocable and shall be made on an original, timely filed return required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) for the taxable year of the election in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 17.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 19916.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 19916.)
-------------------------------------------

19912.

(a) For purposes of this part, “qualified entity” means an entity that meets both of the following requirements for the taxable year:

(1) The entity is taxed as a partnership or “S” corporation.

(2) The entity’s partners, shareholders, or members in that taxable year are exclusively corporations, as defined in Section 23038, or taxpayers as defined in Section 17004.

(b) “Qualified entity” shall not include any of the following:

(1) Publicly traded partnerships, as defined in Section 7704 of the Internal Revenue Code, as it read on January 1, 2021, as modified by Section 17008.5.

(2) An entity that is permitted or required to be in a combined reporting group, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 25106.5 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 17.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 19916.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 19916.)
-------------------------------------------

19914.

(a) The elective tax authorized by this part shall be due and payable as follows:

(1) On or before June 15 during the taxable year of the election, an amount equal to, or greater than, either 50 percent of the elective tax paid the prior taxable year or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater.

(2) On or before the due date of the original return that the qualified entity is required to file pursuant to Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) without regard to any extension of time for filing the return for the taxable year of the
 election made pursuant to Section 19910, an amount equal to the amount of the elective tax under subdivision (a) of Section 19910, less the payment made on or before June 15 of the taxable year pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if no payment is made as required by paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), or if a payment is made that is less than the amount required by paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), a qualified entity may make the election under Section 19910 for that taxable year.

(c) All payments made pursuant to this section shall be made in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) This part shall not change any filing requirements under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2
 (commencing with Section 18401), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(e) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations that are necessary or appropriate to implement this part.

(2) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any regulation, rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 17.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 19916.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 19916.)
-------------------------------------------

19916.

(a) This part shall only become operative if the operation of Section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the limitation on individual deductions for taxable years 2018 through 2025, is extended.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), this part shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(c) If before December 1, 2031, Section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, is repealed, this part would become inoperative for taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 after Section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code is repealed, and this part shall be repealed as of December 1 of that
 year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 17.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Part 10.4.1, commencing with Section 19910.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10.5. SENIOR CITIZENS PROPERTY TAX ASSISTANCE AND POSTPONEMENT LAW [20501. - 20646.]



  CHAPTER 1. Senior Citizens Homeowners and Renters Property Tax Assistance Law [20501. - 20564.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [20501. - 20514.]

20501.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Gonsalves-Deukmejian-Petris Senior Citizens Property Tax Assistance Law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20502.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter shall govern construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

20503.

(a) “Income” means adjusted gross income as defined in Section 17072 plus all of the following cash items:

(1) Public assistance and relief.

(2) Nontaxable amount of pensions and annuities.

(3) Social security benefits
 (except Medicare).

(4) Railroad retirement benefits.

(5) Unemployment insurance payments.

(6) Veterans’ benefits.

(7) Exempt interest received from any source.

(8) Gifts and inheritances in excess of three hundred dollars ($300), other than transfers between members of the household. Gifts and inheritances include noncash items.

(9) Amounts contributed on behalf of the contributor to a tax-sheltered retirement plan or deferred compensation plan.

(10) Temporary workers’ compensation payments.

(11) Sick leave payments.

(12) Nontaxable military compensation as defined in Section 112 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(13) Nontaxable scholarship and fellowship grants as defined in Section 117 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(14) Nontaxable gain from the sale of a residence as defined in Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(15) Life insurance proceeds to the extent that the proceeds exceed the expenses incurred for the last illness and funeral of the deceased spouse of the claimant. “Expenses incurred for the last illness” includes unreimbursed expenses paid or incurred during the income calendar year and any expenses paid or incurred thereafter up until the date the claim is filed. For purposes of this paragraph, funeral expenses
 shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(16) If an alternative minimum tax is required to be paid pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 17062) of Part 10, the amount of alternative minimum taxable income (whether or not cash) in excess of the regular taxable income.

(17) Annual winnings from the California Lottery in excess of six hundred dollars ($600) for the current year.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, total income shall be determined for the calendar year (or approved fiscal year ending within that calendar year) which ends within the fiscal year for which assistance is claimed.

(c) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639),
 and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640), all losses and nonexpenses shall be converted to zero for the purpose of determining whether the homeowner meets the Property Tax Postponement requirement.

(d) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639), and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640), total income shall be determined for the calendar year ending immediately prior to the commencement of the fiscal year for which postponement is claimed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 10.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

20504.

“Household income” means all income received by all persons of a household while members of such household. In the case of a nonresident claimant, “household income” also includes all income of the claimant during the year without regard to source.
